North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-11.1 Potato Production Contracts [Repealed]

4-11.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 60, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-11.1-02.
Unfair acts and practices prohibited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 60, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-11.1-03.
Civil liability for damages from violation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 60, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-11.1-04.
Good faith — Damages for violation — Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 60, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-11.1-05.
Recapture of capital investment required by a potato production contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 60, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.